dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="medi/um__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ana</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umen</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ena</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>umet</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ave__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tå__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>r</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="satan__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="y__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>-n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>:n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spec/ies__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ies</l><r>ies<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ieset</l><r>ies<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>set</l><r>ies<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ies</l><r>ies<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sen</l><r>ies<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iesen</l><r>ies<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ies</l><r>ies<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dagsb/ot__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>oten</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ot</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öterna</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öter</l><r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bo/a__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>or</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>orna</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>an</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="deponens__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="håken__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bärs__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bas__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="varuhylla"><i>varuhyll</i><par n="bo/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="pärs"><i>pärs</i><par n="bas__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="försändelse"><i>försändelse</i><par n="tå__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="adjö"><i>adjö</i><par n="ave__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tops"><i>tops</i><par n="bärs__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="nattsidan"><i>nattsidan</i><par n="håken__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="professorska"><i>professorsk</i><par n="bo/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="y"><i>y</i><par n="y__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="pyjamas"><i>pyjamas</i><par n="bärs__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="snörpande"><i>snörpande</i><par n="ave__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kurbits"><i>kurbits</i><par n="bas__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bromsverkan"><i>bromsverkan</i><par n="satan__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bellis"><i>bellis</i><par n="bärs__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="girandole"><i>girandole</i><par n="tå__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="dagsbot"><i>dagsb</i><par n="dagsb/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="uppdagande"><i>uppdagande</i><par n="ave__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tillförsäkran"><i>tillförsäkran</i><par n="satan__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="glasskiva"><i>glasskiv</i><par n="bo/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="styrelseledamot"><i>styrelseledam</i><par n="dagsb/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="morgonkvisten"><i>morgonkvisten</i><par n="håken__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="valrörelse"><i>valrörelse</i><par n="tå__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="fuskbygge"><i>fuskbygge</i><par n="ave__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tidsspillan"><i>tidsspillan</i><par n="satan__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="parkeringsbot"><i>parkeringsb</i><par n="dagsb/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bris"><i>bris</i><par n="bas__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ledamot"><i>ledam</i><par n="dagsb/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="badkappa"><i>badkapp</i><par n="bo/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="förnekelse"><i>förnekelse</i><par n="tå__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="klematis"><i>klematis</i><par n="bärs__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="svärdssidan"><i>svärdssidan</i><par n="håken__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="strosande"><i>strosande</i><par n="ave__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tvekan"><i>tvekan</i><par n="satan__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="avocado"><i>avocado</i><par n="tå__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="psalmvers"><i>psalmvers</i><par n="bas__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="sadelnäsa"><i>sadelnäs</i><par n="bo/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ditvägen"><i>ditvägen</i><par n="håken__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="dissande"><i>dissande</i><par n="ave__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vägran"><i>vägran</i><par n="satan__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="byxdress"><i>byxdress</i><par n="bas__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bärs"><i>bärs</i><par n="bärs__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="tillvitelse"><i>tillvitelse</i><par n="tå__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bagis"><i>bagis</i><par n="bärs__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="doppardan"><i>doppardan</i><par n="håken__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="amsaga"><i>amsag</i><par n="bo/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="trängtan"><i>trängtan</i><par n="satan__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="hämsko"><i>hämsko</i><par n="tå__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kvalitetsarbete"><i>kvalitetsarbete</i><par n="ave__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="köksvägen"><i>köksvägen</i><par n="håken__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bas"><i>bas</i><par n="bas__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="deponens"><i>deponens</i><par n="deponens__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="direktlinje"><i>direktlinje</i><par n="tå__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bessemerprocessen"><i>bessemerprocessen</i><par n="håken__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="julgransmatta"><i>julgransmatt</i><par n="bo/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="riksdagsledamot"><i>riksdagsledam</i><par n="dagsb/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kvidan"><i>kvidan</i><par n="satan__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="morgonsidan"><i>morgonsidan</i><par n="håken__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="hedersledamot"><i>hedersledam</i><par n="dagsb/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="straffområde"><i>straffområde</i><par n="ave__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="disciplinbot"><i>disciplinb</i><par n="dagsb/ot__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ananas"><i>ananas</i><par n="bas__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="östan"><i>östan</i><par n="satan__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="skinnjacka"><i>skinnjack</i><par n="bo/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="medium"><i>medi</i><par n="medi/um__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="species"><i>spec</i><par n="spec/ies__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="katten"><i>katten</i><par n="håken__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="cirkusmanege"><i>cirkusmanege</i><par n="tå__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ynglingasinne"><i>ynglingasinne</i><par n="ave__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="puls"><i>puls</i><par n="bas__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="småsnäppa"><i>småsnäpp</i><par n="bo/a__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="bomullstops"><i>bomullstops</i><par n="bärs__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="rits"><i>rits</i><par n="bas__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="garnerande"><i>garnerande</i><par n="ave__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="djurdyrkan"><i>djurdyrkan</i><par n="satan__n_ut"/></e>
